Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
If, because this section does not contain a reasonable procedure for asserting the right of confrontation of laboratory employees, the trial has begun, the assertion of that right when it does arise is all that is required of the accused and casts upon the state the burden of either producing the witness for cross-examination or requesting a continuance in order to produce him. Hendrix v. State, 40 Ark. App. 52, 842 S.W.2d 443 (1992).

Trial court did not err in refusing to allow defendant the opportunity to question crime lab personnel after he had properly demanded to do so as it was a felony to sell counterfeit drug substances; defendant had committed an offense punishable by incarceration and was subject to a revocation of his probation, whether or not the substances found in the two baggies were narcotics, thus, the crime lab personnel's testimony was not necessary to prove the prosecution's case. Roston v. State, 362 Ark. 408, 208 S.W.3d 759 (2005).

The General Assembly intended for the phrase “duly attested to” to require more than the mere signature of the person or chemist who performed that analysis. Nard v. State, 304 Ark. 159, 801 S.W.2d 634 (1991); Willis v. State, 309 Ark. 328, 829 S.W.2d 417 (1992).

Where the chemist's report is stamped a certified copy and notarized the duly attested requirement is not fulfilled. Nard v. State, 304 Ark. 159, 801 S.W.2d 634 (1991).

Attestation contained on the face of chemist's report held sufficient. Dodson v. State, 326 Ark. 637, 934 S.W.2d 198 (1996).

Some indicia of truthfulness must attend a chemist report's admissibility when it is introduced into a criminal proceeding as competent evidence. That assurance of truthfulness can best be given by the one who performed the test and made the analysis as is provided by subdivision (d)(1) of this section. Nard v. State, 304 Ark. 159, 801 S.W.2d 634 (1991).

It was error for the trial court to admit into evidence a chemical analysis report which did not conform to the requirements of subdivision (d)(1) of this section; however, when considering the report and other evidence presented by the state, sufficient evidence existed to support the conviction or count in issue and it was therefore proper to remand on that count for possible retrial rather than dismiss the count. Nard v. State, 304 Ark. 159, 801 S.W.2d 634 (1991).

Admission of crime laboratory chemist's report, over defendant's objection and without permitting defendant to cross-examine laboratory employees, contributed to defendant's conviction of delivery of a controlled substance, and since its admission was not harmless beyond a reasonable doubt, defendant's conviction was reversed and remanded. Hendrix v. State, 40 Ark. App. 52, 842 S.W.2d 443 (1992).

Because this section does not contain a reasonable procedure for asserting the right of confrontation when that right arises after the trial has begun, the assertion of that right when it does arise is all that is required of the accused and casts upon the state the burden of either producing the witness for cross-examination or requesting a continuance in order to produce him. Lockhart v. State, 314 Ark. 394, 862 S.W.2d 265 (1993).

The state has the burden of producing the chemist or obtaining a continuance when the state has caused the defendant to be unable to comply with this section's ten-day notice prerequisite; however, defendant is required to inform the state that he desires to have the analyst present at trial so the state will know it has the burden to produce the analyst as a witness. Lockhart v. State, 314 Ark. 394, 862 S.W.2d 265 (1993).

The defendant failed to show that he was deprived of his right of confrontation when the physician who actually performed an autopsy on the murder victim could not appear at trial and another physician from the laboratory testified in his place since he failed to show that he was prejudiced by the absence of the former physician. Marta v. State, 336 Ark. 67, 983 S.W.2d 924 (1999).

Although defendant argued that the introduction of a crime laboratory report without the chemist being available for cross-examination violated his right to confront the witnesses against him, defendant failed to give the required notice requesting the analyst's presence. Defendant cited no authority for his argument that he was excused from the notice requirement because the analyst, who was on maternity leave and was not called as a witness by the prosecution, appeared on the prosecution's witness list.Jones v. State, 2011 Ark. App. 683 (2011).

Even though the trial court violated defendant's right to confrontation under the Sixth Amendment by allowing a substitute analyst to testify regarding the results of a DNA test performed by another analyst, the error was harmless beyond a reasonable doubt; the victim's vivid description of being raped repeatedly and painfully by defendant constituted sufficient evidence to sustain his convictions of rape and second-degree sexual assault.Alejandro-Alvarez v. State, 2019 Ark. App. 450, 587 S.W.3d 269 (2019).

If the defendant does not give the statutory notice prior to the proceedings that he wants the person who performed the analysis to be present for cross-examination, the right of confrontation is waived. Johnson v. State, 303 Ark. 12, 792 S.W.2d 863 (1990).

Cited: Robinson v. State, 317 Ark. 512, 879 S.W.2d 419 (1994); Sanford v. State, 331 Ark. 334, 962 S.W.2d 335 (1998).

The State Crime Laboratory Board shall promulgate rules not contrary to law regarding the release of reports and information by the staff of the laboratory.

All records, files, and information obtained or developed by the laboratory pertaining to a capital offense committed by a defendant who is subsequently sentenced to death for the commission of the capital offense shall be preserved and retained until the defendant's execution.

The records and reports of autopsies, evidence analyses, drug analyses, and any investigations made by the State Crime Laboratory under the authority of this subchapter shall be received as competent evidence as to the matters contained therein in the courts of this state subject to the applicable rules of criminal procedure or civil procedure when duly attested to by the Director of the State Crime Laboratory or his or her assistants, associates, or deputies.

This section does not abrogate a defendant's right of cross-examination if notice of intention to cross-examine is given before the date of a hearing or trial pursuant to the applicable rules of criminal procedure or civil procedure.

The testimony of the appropriate analyst may be compelled by the issuance of a proper subpoena, in which case the records and reports shall be admissible through the analyst who shall be subject to cross-examination by the defendant or his or her counsel, either in person or via two-way closed-circuit or satellite-transmitted television pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.

(1)All records and reports of an evidence analysis of the laboratory shall be received as competent evidence as to the facts in any court or other proceeding when duly attested to by the analyst who performed the analysis.

Except trials in which the defendant is charged with capital murder, § 5-10-101, or murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102, in all criminal trials upon motion of the prosecutor the court may allow the prosecutor to present the testimony of the appropriate analyst by contemporaneous transmission from a laboratory facility via two-way closed-circuit or satellite-transmitted television which shall allow the examination and cross-examination of the analyst to proceed as though the analyst were testifying in the courtroom:

The State Crime Laboratory shall charge certain fees in an amount to be determined by the State Crime Laboratory Board, but subject to the limitations set forth in this section for certain records, reports, and consultations by laboratory physicians and analysts, and expert witness testimony provided in the trial of civil lawsuits, as follows:

The fees under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section shall be at a rate not to exceed two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225) per hour or one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,800) per day and shall be levied against the requesting individual, agency, or organization for work done in civil cases in which laboratory personnel involvement results from the performance of duties and responsibilities under this subchapter; and

A charge of up to three thousand dollars ($3,000) for each autopsy requested by non-law enforcement officials.

At no time shall any fee be levied or charge made to or against any law enforcement agency of the State of Arkansas for work performed under the provisions of this subchapter.

(1)All fees collected by the laboratory for copies of the following shall be deposited as a refund to expenditures:

Autopsy reports;

Autopsies requested by the Federal Aviation Administration, the Federal Bureau of Prisons, or the Department of Health for sudden infant death syndrome cases; and

Expenses paid employees for testimony as expert witnesses.

Other moneys derived from the charges provided for and authorized by this section shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account of the State General Government Fund.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment, in (a)(2)(B), inserted “under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section”, substituted “two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225)” for “seventy-five dollars ($75.00)”, and substituted “one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,800)” for “six hundred dollars ($600)”; and substituted “three thousand dollars ($3,000)” for “one thousand dollars ($1,000)” in (a)(3).

The 2013 amendment by No. 296 rewrote (c)(1).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1129 inserted “an entity” in (a)(1).

(1)The county coroner, prosecuting attorney, and either the county sheriff or the chief of police of the municipality in which the death of a human being occurs shall be promptly notified by any physician, law enforcement officer, undertaker or embalmer, jailer, or coroner or by any other person present or with knowledge of the death if:

The death appears to be caused by violence or appears to be the result of a homicide or a suicide or to be accidental;

The death appears to be the result of the presence of drugs or poisons in the body;

The death appears to be a result of a motor vehicle accident, or the body was found in or near a roadway or railroad;

The death appears to be a result of a motor vehicle accident and there is no obvious trauma to the body;

The death occurs while the person is in a state mental institution or hospital and there is no previous medical history to explain the death, or while the person is in police custody or jail other than a jail operated by the Division of Correction;

The death appears to be the result of a fire or an explosion;

The death of a minor child appears to indicate child abuse prior to death;

Human skeletal remains are recovered or an unidentified deceased person is discovered;

Postmortem decomposition exists to the extent that an external examination of the corpse cannot rule out injury, or in which the circumstances of death cannot rule out the commission of a crime;

The death appears to be the result of drowning;

The death is of an infant or a minor child under eighteen (18) years of age;

The manner of death appears to be other than natural;

The death is sudden and unexplained;

The death occurs at a work site;

The death is due to a criminal abortion;

The death is of a person where a physician was not in attendance within thirty-six (36) hours preceding death, or, in prediagnosed terminal or bedfast cases, within thirty (30) days;

A person is admitted to a hospital emergency room unconscious and is unresponsive, with cardiopulmonary resuscitative measures being performed, and dies within twenty-four (24) hours of admission without regaining consciousness or responsiveness, unless a physician was in attendance within thirty-six (36) hours preceding presentation to the hospital, or, in cases in which the decedent had a prediagnosed terminal or bedfast condition, unless a physician was in attendance within thirty (30) days preceding presentation to the hospital;

The death occurs in the home; or

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2001, No. 80, § 2, stated that “Arkansas Code 12-12-315(a) is amended to read as follows:” and then set out only subdivision (a)(1) of the section. As subdivision (a)(2) was neither contained in nor deleted from (a) as set out in Acts 2001, No. 80, the act was interpreted as amending subdivision (a)(1) only.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment by No. 194 substituted “under eighteen (18) years of age” for “in cases in which there is no previous medical history to explain the death” in (a)(1)(K).

The 2007 amendment by No. 594 added (a)(1)(S) and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 165 substituted “Department of Health” for “Department of Human Services” in (a)(1)(S)(ii), and made a minor punctuation change.

The 2009 amendment by No. 1286 rewrote the introductory language of (a)(1); substituted “or jail other than a jail operated by the Department of Correction” for “a jail or a penal institution” in (a)(1)(E); added (b); and redesignated former (b) as (c).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a)(1)(E); and substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b).

Cross References. Coroner may collect and secure decedent's prescription medication, §14-15-306.

Coroner's investigation, §14-15-302.

Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

The purpose of this section is to create a scientific and uniform method of investigating violent and unusual deaths. Stewart v. State, 257 Ark. 753, 519 S.W.2d 733, cert. denied, 423 U.S. 859, 96 S. Ct. 113, 46 L. Ed. 2d 86 (1975).

Notification provisions of this section did not establish exclusive authority to conduct autopsies so as to prohibit an experienced pathologist who was not a qualified medical examiner from performing autopsy and then testifying. Stewart v. State, 257 Ark. 753, 519 S.W.2d 733, cert. denied, 423 U.S. 859, 96 S. Ct. 113, 46 L. Ed. 2d 86 (1975).

Cited: Bramlett v. Hobbs, 2015 Ark. 146, 463 S.W.3d 283 (2015).

The death poses a potential threat to public health or safety.

Upon receiving notice of a death that poses a potential threat to public health or safety, the county coroner shall immediately notify the Department of Health.

With regard to any death in a correctional facility, the county coroner and the State Medical Examiner shall be notified, and when previous medical history does not exist to explain the death, the Division of Arkansas State Police shall be notified.

A violation of the provisions of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

The State Crime Laboratory is authorized to transport bodies of persons whose death is subject to the provisions of this subchapter to an appropriate place for autopsy or for any other scientific tests.

(1)(A)The bodies of such deceased persons shall be returned to the county from which they were brought by or at the expense of the laboratory only if the State Medical Examiner determines that the cause of death was not suicide, accidental, or from natural causes.

In cases in which the examiner determines that the cause of death was suicide, accidental, or from natural causes, the expense of transporting and returning the bodies of such deceased persons shall be borne by whomever requests the laboratory to examine the cause of death, except for cases referred under the provisions of § 12-12-315(a)(2).

A body may be transported when authorized by the prosecuting attorney, circuit court, county sheriff, or chief of police, or upon the request of the next of kin of the deceased or the persons who may be responsible for burial, to a place other than the county of origin.

The laboratory shall not, however, be required to provide actual transportation or the cost of transportation in excess of what would be required to return the body to the county of origin.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (c), substituted “Director of the State Crime Laboratory” for “Executive Director of the State Crime Laboratory” and “director” for “executive director”.

Cross References. Transportation of the dead, §20-7-115.

The laboratory shall provide transportation or shall bear the cost of transportation at the option of the Director of the State Crime Laboratory, but in no case shall the cost of transportation of dead bodies subject to the provisions of this subchapter be borne by the laboratory without the prior approval and authorization of the director or his or her staff.

Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section, the certificate of death of a person whose death is investigated under this subchapter shall be made by the State Medical Examiner or by his or her designee or by the county coroner, whoever conducted the investigation.

The examiner or his or her designee shall make and sign a certificate of death if:

The person who performs the postmortem examination shall make and sign the certificate of death; or

(A)The certificate of death is for a person executed for a capital offense.

The examiner or his or her designee shall list on the certificate of death of a person executed for a capital offense the:

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, added “Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section” in (a); rewrote (b);in (c), substituted “certificate of death” for “death certificate” following “listed”, substituted “designee” for “assistant” preceding “who signed”, and added “of death” at the end; and made stylistic changes.

Manner of death as “Pursuant to a judicial sentence of death — Execution”; and

Cause of death as “electrocution” or “lethal injection”, as applicable.

When a petition is filed with a court of competent jurisdiction to change the cause or manner of death listed on a certificate of death which has been signed by the examiner or by his or her designee, the State Crime Laboratory shall be notified of such petition, and the examiner or his or her designee shall be allowed to hear testimony presented by the petitioner and shall be given an opportunity to present evidence to the court to support the original ruling of the examiner or his or her designee who signed the certificate of death.

(1)When death occurs in such a manner or under such circumstances as described in § 12-12-315, the State Crime Laboratory shall have the power and authority to perform such functions and duties as may be provided by this subchapter.

County coroner of the county in which death occurs or is discovered;

Prosecuting attorney of the jurisdiction in which death occurs or is discovered;

County sheriff of the county in which death occurs or is discovered;

Chief of police of the city in which death occurs or is discovered;

Board of Corrections or its designee, or the Director of the Division of Correction or his or her designee if the person was in the care, custody, or control of the Division of Correction at the time of death; or

Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police or his or her designee.

Deputies of elected officers enumerated in subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section shall have no authority to request a postmortem examination by the laboratory.

(1)In cases of sudden death in children between the ages of one (1) year and six (6) years with no previous major medical health problems, the State Medical Examiner, on a case-by-case basis, may delegate authority to the Arkansas Children's Hospital to perform postmortem examinations to determine the cause of death.

In addition, the examiner will be responsible for developing guidelines to assure that proper evidentiary procedures are followed.

For purposes of this section, the hospital's staff pediatric pathologist, meeting the criteria prescribed in §12-12-307, shall be considered assistant medical examiner and, notwithstanding any other provisions in this section, may perform postmortem examinations as directed by a duly constituted authority.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the State Crime Laboratory” for “Executive Director of the State Crime Laboratory” in the introductory language of (a)(2)(A); substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” twice in (a)(2)(A)(v); substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(2)(A)(vi); and substituted “Director of the State Crime Laboratory” for “executive director” in (d), (e), (f)(1), and (f)(2).

No violation of this section occurred where the deputy coroner observed the deceased at the crime scene, notified the State Crime Lab and took the body to the crime lab in a coroner's van, since the county coroner also went to the crime scene, observed the body, and ordered it photographed and sent to the crime lab. Cavin v. State, 313 Ark. 238, 855 S.W.2d 285 (1993).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the State Crime Laboratory” for “Executive Director of the State Crime Laboratory” in (b).

Cross References. Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “an appropriate organization” for “the Arkansas Dwarf Association” in (a).

ALR.

Civil liability in conjunction with autopsy. 97 A.L.R.5th 419.

Evidence held sufficient to justify trial court's order to exhume body and secure autopsy. Donaldson v. Holcomb, 239 Ark. 958, 396 S.W.2d 281 (1965) (decision under prior law).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1997, No. 254, did not contain a section heading.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the State Crime Laboratory” for “Executive Director of the State Crime Laboratory” in (a)(5).

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1999, No. 1120, § 1, provided:

“Legislative intent. As stated in the comment to section 505 of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, ‘Effective law enforcement demands that there be a means of confiscating the vehicles and instrumentalities used by drug traffickers in committing violations under this act. The reasoning is to prevent their use in the commission of subsequent offenses involving transportation or concealment of controlled substances and to deprive the drug trafficker of needed mobility.’ The General Assembly recognizes the importance of asset forfeiture as a means to confront drug trafficking. However, the General Assembly also recognizes that under the system that existed prior to the enactment of this act, the lack of uniformity and accountability in forfeiture procedures across the state has undermined confidence in the system. As the United States Supreme Court has stated, ‘Forfeiture provisions are powerful weapons in the war on crime; like any such weapons, their impact can be devastating when used unjustly.’ In order to alleviate the problems resulting from the lack of uniformity and accountability, the General Assembly has determined that time limits for initiating forfeiture proceedings and stricter controls over forfeited property will help alleviate such problems while strengthening forfeiture as a vital weapon against drug trafficking. Specifically, it is the intent of §5-64-505(a) that there be no forfeitures based solely upon a misdemeanor possession of a controlled substance. However, if the prosecuting attorney can prove that other evidence exists to establish a basis for forfeiture, the property may be forfeited. It is the intent of §5-64-505(d) to reduce the conflict between state and federal authorities over seizures executed by state law enforcement officers. It is the intent of §5-64-505(h) to allow law enforcement agencies and drug task forces to maintain forfeited property for official use, provided that the final order disposing of such property defines the legal entity that is responsible for such property. Section5-64-505(i)(1)(D) governs those situations in which a seizure results in the forfeiture of money and or property in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). It is the specific intent of the General Assembly that forfeiture proceedings not be structured in such a way as to defeat the General Assembly's intent that money or property in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) be transferred to the Special State Assets Forfeiture Fund. It is determined that such fund can best be used to combat drug trafficking statewide.”

Postmortem examinations or investigations authorized in this section may be conducted without consent of any person.

The Director of the State Crime Laboratory and his or her staff shall not, as a part of their official duties, perform any postmortem examination at the request of any private citizen or any public official other than those enumerated in this section.

The provisions of this section shall supersede any and all other laws relating to the power and authority of the Director of the State Crime Laboratory or his or her staff, including the examiner, to conduct examinations, investigations, or postmortem examinations.

(1)The Director of the State Crime Laboratory shall have the final authority on any ruling of manner of death which may become a matter of dispute between those persons authorized by this section to request a post-mortem examination as described in § 12-12-315 and the examiner or his or her associates.

It shall be unlawful to embalm a dead body when the body is subject to examination by the State Medical Examiner or his or her associates, assistants, or deputies as provided for in this subchapter, unless authorized by the examiner or his or her associates, assistants, or deputies or unless authorized by the prosecuting attorney of the jurisdiction in which the death occurs to so embalm.

When a body subject to examination by the examiner or his or her associates has been embalmed without authorization by or prior notice to the examiner or his or her associates, assistants, or deputies as provided for in this subchapter, the Director of the State Crime Laboratory may, at his or her discretion, require an order from the circuit court of the jurisdiction in which death occurred before proceeding with his or her duties and responsibilities under this subchapter.

Persons violating the provisions of this section shall be deemed guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

The State Medical Examiner and his or her assistants may remove the pituitary gland during the course of an autopsy and donate the pituitary gland to an appropriate organization.

However, the pituitary gland shall not be removed under the authority of this section if the next of kin or the person having the right to control the disposition of the decedent's remains objects.

Where death occurs under such circumstances as are set forth in § 12-12-315 and where a body has been buried without proper certification of death, it shall be the duty of the chief law enforcement official of the county or municipality in which death occurred or in which the body is buried or the State Medical Examiner, his or her associates, assistants, or deputies to notify the prosecuting attorney of the jurisdiction in which death occurred and the body is buried.

The prosecuting attorney shall thereupon present the facts to the circuit court of the county, and the court may, by written order, require that the body be exhumed and an autopsy be performed by the State Crime Laboratory or its designee.

A full and complete report of the facts developed by the autopsy shall be furnished to the court and the prosecuting attorney in timely fashion.

The cost of the exhumation and for transportation to and from the place of autopsy shall be borne by the county in which the death occurred.

(1)The State Crime Laboratory is authorized to provide special compensation to certain employees for each full pay period of eighty (80) hours worked in a job which requires contact at crime scenes, emergency sites, or other sites where exposure to potentially hazardous substances is possible.

The rate of pay for individuals who work less than a full pay period of eighty (80) hours or transfer to other work areas not defined in subsection (a) of this section, or both, will not receive any enhanced rate of pay for that or subsequent pay periods.

This section covers employees who respond to clandestine laboratory sites for the purpose of assisting and dismantling of such laboratory sites and is limited to those employees in the position of:

A monthly report shall be made to the Legislative Council describing all payments made to employees under the provisions of this section.

There is created the Crime Lab Equipment Fund on the books of the Auditor of State, the Treasurer of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

The moneys in the fund shall be used by the State Crime Laboratory only for:

A firearm used in the commission of a crime that comes into the custody of a law enforcement agency in this state may be delivered to the State Crime Laboratory within thirty (30) calendar days for forensic testing for firearms meeting the caliber and type determined by the Director of the State Crime Laboratory.

(1)(A)The laboratory may conduct forensic tests on all firearms received and input the resulting data into the National Integrated Ballistics Information Network of the United States Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms, and Explosives.

The forensic tests may include without limitation firing of the firearm and electronic imaging of the bullets and casings.

The laboratory shall coordinate with all participating agencies when investigations require the use of the National Integrated Ballistics Information Network computer database.

The laboratory shall provide written analysis reports and experts for testimony when feasible.

After completion of the forensic testing, the firearm shall be returned to the law enforcement agency that submitted the firearm for forensic testing.

When the law enforcement agency regains possession of the firearm and after final adjudication, the law enforcement agency shall immediately notify the owner, unless the owner is prohibited by law from possessing the firearm, that the owner may regain possession of the firearm at the offices of the law enforcement agency.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment redesignated former (a)(1)(A) and (B) as present (a)(1) and (a)(2); substituted “used in the commission of a crime that” for “which” in present (a)(1); deleted former (a)(2); substituted “laboratory may” for “laboratory shall” in (b)(1)(A); in (b)(1)(B), substituted “tests may” for “tests shall” and “electronic imaging of” for “photographing”; deleted former (b)(5) and (d); redesignated former (b)(6) and (e) as present (b)(5) and (d); substituted “Department of Arkansas State Police” for “department” in (c); and added present (e).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 1010 rewrote (a), (b), and (e).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning autopsies and anatomical gifts, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 839, § 3. The section was derived from Acts 2005, No. 1782, § 1.

A law enforcement agency in this state may request the assistance of the Division of Arkansas State Police in tracing a firearm.

A firearm seized by the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission for violation of a commission rule is exempt from this section.

The State Crime Laboratory Board may adopt rules for the implementation of this section, including without limitation rules regarding forensic testing of a firearm and procedures for submission of a firearm.

As used in this section:

A member of:

Any regular or auxiliary police force on a full-time or part-time basis; or

The Division of Arkansas State Police; or

A sheriff or deputy sheriff of any county.

A coroner or a supervisor of a firefighter, police officer, or eligible person shall promptly notify the State Medical Examiner if the firefighter, police officer, or eligible person dies in the line of duty as a result of injuries sustained in the line of duty or within twenty-four (24) hours after participating in an emergency situation.

(1)(A)The examiner may conduct an autopsy on any firefighter, police officer, or eligible person who dies in the line of duty as a result of injuries sustained in the line of duty or within twenty-four (24) hours after participating in an emergency situation.

The autopsy shall be sufficient to determine eligibility for benefits under the Public Safety Officers' Benefits Act of 1976 or the Hometown Heroes Survivors Benefits Act of 2003, 42 U.S.C. § 3796 et seq., as appropriate.

A report of the autopsy shall be provided to the firefighter's or police officer's commanding officer or the supervisor of the eligible person.

(A)If the firefighter, police officer, or eligible person has agreed in writing to allow an autopsy under this section, that directive shall be followed unless the firefighter's, police officer's, or eligible person's spouse dictates otherwise after being notified of the prospective autopsy.

If the firefighter, police officer, or eligible person has not agreed in writing to allow an autopsy under this section, the firefighter's, police officer's, or eligible person's spouse may decide whether or not an autopsy will be performed.

If the firefighter's, police officer's, or eligible person's spouse chooses not to allow the autopsy:

No autopsy may be performed; and

The body of the firefighter, police officer, or eligible person shall be released to the next of kin.

The written notice under subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this section shall include a toxicology report.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “eligible person” for “other person with a similar eligibility under the two (2) acts specified in subdivision (c)(1)(B) of this section” or similar language throughout the section; inserted (a)(1) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; substituted “written notice under subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this section” for “letter” in (c)(3)(B); and made numerous minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(3)(A)(ii).

Effective Dates. Acts 1983, No. 403, § 10: Mar. 13, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law regarding the providing of emergency medical treatment, and payment therefor, to victims of sexual assault are unclear and in need of immediate clarification in order to maintain the financial integrity of the program, and that this act is immediately necessary to accomplish the same. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 396, § 10: Mar. 7, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of previous enactments of the General Assembly providing for reparations to crime victims failed to provide sufficient assessments to adequately fund the Crime Victims Reparations Fund and that it is therefore necessary to increase the amounts assessed to compensate and assist victims of criminal acts who suffer personal injury or death. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 214, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1120; Acts 1999, No. 1109, § 1.